New York, session 2025-2026, A3959.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Section 139 of the public service law is amended by adding 2 a new subdivision 2-a to read as follows: 3 2-a. If a major electric transmission facility siting permit is 4 proposed for a site which is grassland bird breeding habitat or grass- 5 land bird wintering habitat within a department of environmental conser- 6 vation designated grassland bird conservation center, ORES shall require 7 a mitigation ratio of three acres for every acre of occupied grassland 8 bird breeding habitat and three acres of mitigation for every acre of 9 grassland bird wintering habitat determined to be taken. In order to 10 provide a net conservation benefit in such grassland bird conservation 11 centers, these mitigation requirements shall not be modified by dividing 12 the impact of habitat taken by five life cycles of habitat succession or 13 any other additional calculation. 14 § 2. This act shall take effect immediately and shall apply to any 15 major electric transmission facility siting permit, or any application 16 for a major facility siting permit, for which the final net conservation 17 benefit plan has not yet been approved by the office of renewable energy 18 siting and electric transmission, provided, however, that the amendments 19 to section 139 of the public service law made by section one of this act 20 shall not affect the repeal of such section and shall be deemed repealed 21 therewith. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD07808-08-6